Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF89.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1771YH (4) 91 th/ns H.F. 89 Section 1. Section 321.307, Code 2025, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 321.307 Following too closely. 3 1. The driver of A person operating a motor vehicle shall 4 not follow another vehicle in the same lane and direction of 5 travel more closely than is reasonable and prudent, having due 6 regard for the speed of such vehicles and the traffic upon and 7 the condition of the highway. For purposes of this subsection, 8 the distance at which a person is following is reasonable and 9 prudent under clear conditions then existing, as follows: 10 a. At least fifty feet on a highway with a speed limit of 11 thirty-five miles per hour or less. 12 b. At least one hundred feet on a highway with a speed 13 limit greater than thirty-five miles per hour but not more than 14 fifty-five miles per hour. 15 c. At least one hundred fifty feet on a highway with a speed 16 limit greater than fifty-five miles per hour but not more than 17 sixty-five miles per hour. 18 d. At least two hundred feet on a highway with a speed limit 19 greater than sixty-five miles per hour. 20 2. A person who violates this section commits a simple 21 misdemeanor punishable as a scheduled violation under section 22 805.8A, subsection 7, paragraph âcâ . 23